West Virginia, session 2026, HB5468.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14. CIVIL SERVICE FOR DEPUTY SHERIFFS. §7-14-17f. Allocation of funds for deputy pay raises. There is hereby allotted from the state's general revenue fund to the counties of this state the amount of $5,000 per deputy position in that county for the purpose of providing for deputy pay raises. The money in this fund shall exclusively be used for deputy pay raises.